Utah statutes.
26-10b-103.   Content of applications.

Applications for grants under this chapter shall include:

(1)  a statement of specific, measurable objectives, and the methods to be used to assess the achievement of those objectives;

(2)  the precise boundaries of the area to be served by the entity making the application, including a description of the medically underserved population to be served by the grant;

(3)  the results of an assessment of need demonstrating that the population to be served has a need for the services provided by the applicant;

(4)  a description of the personnel responsible for carrying out the activities of the grant along with a statement justifying the use of any grant funds for the personnel;

(5)  letters and other forms of evidence showing that efforts have been made to secure financial and professional assistance and support for the services to be provided under the grant;

(6)  a list of services to be provided by the applicant;

(7)  the schedule of fees to be charged by the applicant;

(8)  the estimated number of medically underserved persons to be served with the grant award; and

(9)  other provisions as determined by the department.

